Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6316.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32e. (1) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the unemployment insurance agency shall, in coordination with all of the following departments, implement procedures to electronically access certain databases maintained by those departments: (a) The department of health and human services. (b) The department of corrections. (c) The department of state. (d) Any other federal or state department, including, but not limited to, the Social Security Administration to review death records and the Internal Revenue Service to verify a claimant's income. (2) At the following times, an unemployment insurance agency representative who examines a claimant's claim under section 32(a) shall electronically access the relevant department databases described in subsection (1) to investigate and verify all of the following information about the claimant: (a) Before the unemployment insurance agency issues any benefits to the claimant and at least 1 time per week for the duration that benefits are issued, all of the following information: (i) Job status. (ii) Incarceration status. (iii) Death records status. (b) Before the unemployment insurance agency issues any benefits to the claimant and at least 1 time each calendar quarter for the duration that benefits are issued, both of the following: (i) Identity. (ii) Income. (3) The unemployment insurance agency shall implement reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards, including, but not limited to, encryption and access logging, to protect the data accessed under this section from misuse or unauthorized access or disclosure of data. The safeguards must comply with the data security policies and standards established by the department of technology, management, and budget under section 124 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1124, including access restrictions to authorized users and encryption. (4) The unemployment insurance agency shall submit an annual report to the house and senate appropriations committees that includes all of the following related to the requirements of this section: (a) The number of fraudulent claims the agency detected. (b) The estimated cost savings to taxpayers as a result of the detected fraud under subdivision (a). (c) Implementation challenges related to data access, system integration, privacy compliance, and coordination with other departments. (d) Recommendations for legislative or administrative improvements to strengthen the procedures required under this section and reduce fraud.